North Carolina statutes. Chapter 113. Conservation and Development.
Article 14B. Coastal Recreational Fishing Licenses.

§ 113-174.
Definitions.

As used in this Article:

Repealed by Session Laws 2005-455, s. 1.2, effective January 1, 2007.

(1a)

“CRFL” means Coastal Recreational Fishing License.

“Division” means the Division of Marine Fisheries in the Department of Environmental Quality.

(2a)

“For Hire Vessel” means a charter boat, head boat, dive boat, or other vessel hired to allow individuals to engage in recreational fishing.

“North Carolina resident” means an individual who is a resident within the meaning of

G.S. 113-130(4)

.

“Recreational fishing” means any activity preparatory to, during, or subsequent to the taking of any finfish, the taking of which is subject to regulation by the Marine Fisheries Commission, by any means if the purpose of the taking is to obtain finfish that are not to be sold. “Recreational fishing” does not include the taking of finfish:

By a commercial fishing operation as defined in

G.S. 113-168

.

For scientific purposes pursuant to

G.S. 113-261

.

Under a RCGL issued pursuant to

G.S. 113-173

.

Repealed by Session Laws 2005-455, s. 1.2, effective January 1, 2007.

History.

2004-187, s. 2; 2005-455, ss. 1.2, 1.19; 2013-360, s. 14.8(n); 2015-241, s. 14.30(u).

§ 113-174.1.
License required; general provisions governing licenses.

License Required to Engage in Recreational Fishing. — It is unlawful for any individual to engage in recreational fishing in:

Coastal fishing waters that are not joint fishing waters without holding a current license issued under this Article or under Article 25A of this Chapter that authorizes the individual to engage in recreational fishing in coastal fishing waters.

Joint fishing waters without holding a current license issued under this Article or under Article 21 or Article 25A of this Chapter that authorizes the individual to engage in recreational fishing in joint fishing waters.

(a1)

Compliance With Applicable Laws. —

It is unlawful for any individual to engage in recreational fishing without complying with applicable requirements of this Article and Articles 21 and 25A of this Chapter and with applicable rules adopted by the Marine Fisheries Commission and the Wildlife Resources Commission.

(a2)

Fourth of July Free Fishing Day. —

The fourth day of July of each year is declared a free fishing day to promote the sport of fishing, and no license issued under this Article or Article 25A of this Chapter is required to fish in any of the public waters of the State on that day. All other laws and rules pertaining to recreational fishing apply.

Sale of Fish Prohibited. — A license issued under this Article or Article 25A of this Chapter does not authorize an individual who takes or lands any species of fish under the authority of the Marine Fisheries Commission to sell, offer for sale, barter, or exchange the fish for anything of value. Except as provided in

G.S. 113-168.4

, it is unlawful for any individual who takes or lands any species of fish under the authority of the Marine Fisheries Commission by any means to sell, offer for sale, barter, or exchange these fish for anything of value.

Assignment and Transfer Prohibited. — It is unlawful to buy, sell, lend, borrow, assign, or otherwise transfer a license issued under this Article or Article 25A of this Chapter or to attempt to buy, sell, lend, borrow, assign, or otherwise transfer a license issued under this Article or Article 25A of this Chapter.

, (e) Repealed by Session Laws 2005-455, s. 1.3, effective January 1, 2007.

(f)

Cancellation of Fraudulent License; Penalties. —

The Wildlife Resources Commission may cancel a license issued by the Commission under this Article or Article 25A of this Chapter if the license was issued on the basis of false information supplied by the license applicant. The Division may cancel a For Hire Blanket License issued under

G.S. 113-174.3

if the license was issued on the basis of false information supplied by the license applicant. A cancelled license is void from the date of issuance. It is a Class 1 misdemeanor for an individual to knowingly do any of the following:

Engage in any activity regulated under this Article with an improper, false, or altered license.

Make any false, fraudulent, or misleading statement in applying for a license issued under this Article or Article 25A of this Chapter.

Counterfeit, alter, or falsify any application or license issued under this Article or Article 25A of this Chapter.

(g)

Reporting Requirements. —

A person licensed under this Article or Article 25A of this Chapter shall comply with the biological data sampling and survey programs of the Marine Fisheries Commission and the Division.

(h)

Replacement Licenses. —

Upon receipt of a proper application together with a fee of five dollars ($5.00), the Wildlife Resources Commission or the Division may issue a new license to replace one issued by the respective agency that has been lost or destroyed before its expiration. The application must be on a form of the Wildlife Resources Commission or the Division setting forth information in sufficient detail to allow ready identification of the lost or destroyed license and ascertainment of the applicant’s continued entitlement to it.

History.

2004-187, s. 2; 2005-455, ss. 1.3, 1.19; 2016-94, s. 14.8.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2005-455, s. 1.3, effective January 1, 2007, rewrote the section.

Session Laws 2016-94, s. 14.8, effective July 1, 2016, in the second sentence of subsection (f), substituted “For Hire Blanket License” for “For Hire Blanket CRFL” near the beginning, and deleted “or an Ocean Fishing Pier Blanket CRFL issued under

G.S. 113-174.4

” near the middle.

§ 113-174.2.
Coastal Recreational Fishing License.

Repealed by Session Laws 2005-455, s. 1.4, effective January 1, 2007.

(a1)

Authorization to Fish in Coastal and Joint Fishing Waters. —

A CRFL issued under this section authorizes the licensee to engage in recreational fishing in coastal fishing waters, including joint fishing waters. A CRFL issued under this section does not authorize the licensee to fish in inland fishing waters.

Repealed by Session Laws 2005-455, s. 1.4, effective January 1, 2007.

Types of CRFLs; Fees; Duration. — The Wildlife Resources Commission shall issue the following CRFLs:

Annual Resident CRFL. — $15.00. This license is valid from the date of issue for a period of 12 months as defined by

G.S. 113-270.1

B(b) and

G.S. 113-270.1

B(c). This license shall be issued only to an individual who is a resident of the State.

(1a)

Annual Nonresident CRFL. —

$30.00. This license is valid from the date of issue for a period of 12 months as defined by G.S. 113-270.1B(b) and G.S. 113-270.1B(c). This license shall be issued only to an individual who is not a resident of the State.

Repealed by Session Laws 2005-455, s. 1.4, effective January 1, 2007.

Repealed by Session Laws 2005-455, s. 1.4, effective January 1, 2007.

Ten-Day Resident CRFL. — $5.00. This license is valid for a period of 10 consecutive days, as indicated on the license. This license shall be issued only to an individual who is a resident of the State.

(4a)

Ten-Day Nonresident CRFL. —

$10.00. This license is valid for a period of 10 consecutive days, as indicated on the license. This license shall be issued only to an individual who is not a resident of the State.

Repealed by Session Laws 2005-455, s. 1.4, effective January 1, 2007.

Lifetime CRFLs. — Except as provided in sub-subdivision j. of this subdivision, CRFLs issued under this subdivision are valid for the lifetime of the licensee.

-d. Repealed by Session Laws 2005-455, s. 1.4, effective January 1, 2007.

e.

Infant Lifetime CRFL. —

$100.00. This license shall be issued only to an individual younger than one year of age.

f.

Youth Lifetime CRFL. —

$150.00. This license shall be issued only to an individual who is one year of age or older but younger than 12 years of age.

g.

Resident Adult Lifetime CRFL. —

$250.00. This license shall be issued only to an individual who is 12 years of age or older but younger than 70 years of age and who is a resident of the State.

h.

Nonresident Adult Lifetime CRFL. —

$500.00. This license shall be issued only to an individual who is 12 years of age or older and who is not a resident of the State.

Resident Age 70 Lifetime CRFL. — $15.00. This license shall be issued only to an individual who is 70 years of age or older and who is a resident of the State.

j.

Resident Disabled Veteran CRFL. —

$10.00. This license shall be issued only to an individual who is a resident of the State and who is a fifty percent (50%) or more disabled veteran as determined by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs or as established by G.S. 113-351(c)(3)(f). This license remains valid for the lifetime of the licensee so long as the licensee remains fifty percent (50%) or more disabled.

k.

Resident Totally Disabled CRFL. —

$10.00. This license shall be issued only to an individual who is a resident of the State and who is totally and permanently disabled as determined by the Social Security Administration or as established by G.S. 113-351(c)(3)(g).

Exemptions. — An individual is exempt from the license requirements of

G.S. 113-174.1(a)

if the individual either:

Is under 16 years of age.

Holds any of the following licenses that were purchased prior to January 1, 2006:

Infant Lifetime Sportsman License issued under

G.S. 113-270.1

D(b)(1).

Youth Lifetime Sportsman License issued under

G.S. 113-270.1

D(b)(2).

Adult Resident Lifetime Sportsman License issued under G.S. 113-270.1D(b)(3).

Nonresident Lifetime Sportsman License issued under G.S. 113-270.1D(b)(4).

Age 70 Resident Lifetime Sportsman License issued under G.S. 113-270.1D(b)(5).

Lifetime Resident Comprehensive Fishing License issued under G.S. 113-271(d)(3).

Lifetime Combination Hunting and Fishing License for Disabled Residents issued under G.S. 113-270.1C(b)(4).

Disabled Resident Sportsman License issued under G.S. 113-270.1D(b)(6).

Holds any of the following licenses:

Lifetime Fishing License for the Legally Blind issued under G.S. 113-271(d)(7).

Adult Care Home Resident Fishing License issued under G.S. 113-271(d)(8).

History.

2004-187, s. 2; 2005-455, ss. 1.4, 1.19; 2006-79, s. 1; 2013-283, s. 11; 2014-100, s. 14.25(b).

§ 113-174.3.
For-Hire Licenses.

, (b) Repealed by Session Laws 2013-360, s. 14.8(o), effective August 1, 2013.

(c)

License. —

It is unlawful for a person to engage in a for-hire operation without having obtained one of the following licenses issued by the Division:

Blanket For-Hire Captain’s CRFL. — This license allows individuals properly licensed by the United States Coast Guard to carry passengers on any vessel with a commercial vessel registration with a for-hire endorsement. A Blanket For-Hire Captain’s CRFL authorizes all individuals on the for-hire vessel who do not hold a license issued under this Article or Article 25A of this Chapter to engage in recreational fishing in coastal fishing waters that are not joint fishing waters. The resident fees for a Blanket For-Hire Captain’s CRFL are two hundred fifty dollars ($250.00) for a vessel carrying six or fewer passengers and three hundred fifty dollars ($350.00) for a vessel carrying more than six passengers. The nonresident fees for a Blanket For-Hire Captain’s CRFL are three hundred twelve dollars and fifty cents ($312.50) for a vessel carrying six or fewer passengers and four hundred thirty-seven dollars and fifty cents ($437.50) for a vessel carrying more than six passengers. Any vessel whose operator is licensed under this subdivision and that is engaged in for-hire fishing must obtain a Commercial Fishing Vessel Registration with a for-hire endorsement.

Blanket For-Hire Vessel CRFL. — This license allows any United States Coast Guard licensed operator to carry passengers aboard the licensed vessel. A Blanket For-Hire Vessel CRFL authorizes all individuals on the for-hire vessel who do not hold a license issued under this Article or Article 25A of this Chapter to engage in recreational fishing in coastal fishing waters that are not joint fishing waters. The resident fees for a Blanket For-Hire Vessel CRFL are two hundred fifty dollars ($250.00) for a vessel carrying six or fewer passengers and three hundred fifty dollars ($350.00) for a vessel carrying more than six passengers. The nonresident fees for a Blanket For-Hire Vessel CRFL are three hundred twelve dollars and fifty cents ($312.50) for a vessel carrying six or fewer passengers and four hundred thirty-seven dollars and fifty cents ($437.50) for a vessel carrying more than six passengers. Any vessel whose operator is licensed under this subdivision and that is engaged in for-hire fishing is not required to obtain a Commercial Fishing Vessel Registration with a for-hire endorsement.

Non-Blanket For-Hire Vessel License. — This license allows any United States Coast Guard licensed operator to carry passengers aboard the licensed vessel. This license does not authorize individuals aboard the vessel to engage in recreational fishing unless they hold an individual CRFL issued under this Article or Article 25A of this Chapter. The fee for the Non-Blanket For-Hire Vessel License is twenty-five dollars ($25.00) for a vessel operated by a resident operator and thirty-seven dollars and fifty cents ($37.50) for a vessel operated by a nonresident operator. Any vessel whose operator is licensed under this subdivision and that is engaged in for-hire fishing is not required to obtain a Commercial Fishing Vessel Registration with a for-hire endorsement.

(d)

A license issued under this section does not authorize individuals to engage in recreational fishing in joint fishing waters or inland fishing waters. All for-hire licenses expire on the last day of the license year.

(e)

Repealed by Session Laws 2015-201, s. 1, effective August 5, 2015.

History.

2005-455, s. 1.5; 2006-255, s. 7; 2006-259, s. 20.5; 2013-360, s. 14.8(o); 2015-201, s. 1.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2006-255, s. 7, effective August 23, 2006, in the introductory language of subsection (a), substituted “Division for the for hire boat” for “Division” at the end of the first sentence, and substituted “A For Hire Blanket CRFL” for “This license” at the beginning of the next to the last sentence.

Session Laws 2006-259, s. 20.5, effective August 23, 2006, rewrote subdivisions (a)(1) and (a)(2).

Session Laws 2013-360, s. 14.8(o), effective August 1, 2013, rewrote the section heading, which formerly read “For Hire Blanket CRFL”; deleted subsections (a) and (b); and added subsections (c), (d), and (e).

Session Laws 2015-201, s. 1, effective August 5, 2015, repealed subsection (e), which read: “Each individual who obtains a for-hire license shall submit to the Division logbooks summarizing catch and effort statistical data to the Division. The Commission may adopt rules that determine the means and methods to satisfy the requirements of this subsection.”

§ 113-174.4.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2013-360, s. 14.8(p), effective August 1, 2013.

History.

2005-455, s. 1.5; repealed by 2013-360, s. 14.8(p), effective August 1, 2013.

§ 113-174.5.
Blocks of 10 Ten-Day Coastal Recreational Fishing Licenses.

The owner of a vessel that is 23 feet or more in length and that is either documented with the United States Coast Guard or registered with the Wildlife Resources Commission pursuant to

G.S. 75A-4

may purchase a block of 10 Ten-Day CRFLs issued by the Division. A vessel owner who wishes to obtain a block of 10 Ten-Day CRFLs shall provide the Division with all information required by the Division, including information identifying the vessel on which the Ten-Day CRFLs will be used. Each individual Ten-Day CRFL shall identify the vessel for which the block of 10 Ten-Day CRFLs is issued. An individual Ten-Day CRFL issued as part of a block of 10 Ten-Day CRFLs may only be used on the vessel for which it was issued. An individual Ten-Day CRFL issued as part of a block of 10 Ten-Day CRFLs may not be used on a for hire vessel. A block of 10 Ten-Day CRFLs shall expire two years from the date of purchase.

The fee for a block of 10 Ten-Day CRFLs is one hundred fifty dollars ($150.00). An individual Ten-Day CRFL issued as part of a block of 10 Ten-Day CRFLs is valid for a period of 10 consecutive days beginning on the date that the license information is recorded as provided by subsection (c) of this section.

Prior to any recreational fishing occurring under the authority of an individual Ten-Day CRFL issued as part of a block of 10 Ten-Day CRFLs, the vessel owner who purchased the block of 10 Ten-Day CRFLs shall record the date fishing activity will begin and the name, address, telephone number, and date of birth of the individual who will be fishing under the authority of the individual Ten-Day CRFL.

A vessel owner who purchases a block of 10 Ten-Day CRFLs shall comply with all data and information reporting requirements of the Division.

A vessel owner who fails to comply with any of the requirements governing the issuance, use, recording, or reporting of blocks of 10 Ten-Day CRFLs will be ineligible to purchase any additional blocks of 10 Ten-Day CRFLs for a period of two years from the date of noncompliance.

History.

2008-141, s. 1; 2013-360, s. 14.8(q).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2013-360, s. 14.8(q), effective August 1, 2013, substituted “vessel” for “boat” in the fifth sentence of subsection (a).